District of Columbia statutes.
47-1066

The Catholic University of America’s Soldiers and Airmen’s Home, parcel No. 121/29.

The Catholic University of America’s Soldiers’ and Airmen’s Home, parcel No. 121/29, located in the Northeast quadrant of the District of Columbia and comprising approximately 49 acres of land generally bounded by North Capitol Street, Irving Street, Michigan Avenue, Harewood Road, and the Pope John Paul II Cultural Center, together with the improvements thereon and owned by The Catholic University of America, shall be exempt from all taxation so long as it is owned and planned for use by, or actually used by, The Catholic University of America for its purposes and activities, and is not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009, as if the exemption were granted administratively.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1162(b), 52 DCR 7503
Short title of subtitle U of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1161 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle U of title I of the act may be cited as the Catholic University of America Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Act of 2005.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1162(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).